Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2106
Certified marriage and family therapist, defined.

Certified marriage and family therapist means a person who is certified to practice marriage and family therapy pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act and who holds a current certificate issued by the department.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,299;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 725.